Maryland, session 2026, SB1006.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 7–202 of Article – General Provisions of the Annotated Code of Maryland
be repealed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section(s) 7–203 through
7–207 of Article – General Provisions of the Annotated Code of Maryland be renumbered
to be Section(s) 7–202 through 7–206, respectively.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – General Provisions
7–201.
[The] IN ACCORDANCE WITH ARTICLE XV, § 8 OF THE MARYLAND
CONSTITUTION, THE Maryland flag is the State flag.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, (Three–fifths of all the members
elected to each of the two Houses concurring), That it be proposed that the Maryland
Constitution read as follows:
Article XV – Miscellaneous
8.
(A) THE STATE FLAG SHALL BE THE MARYLAND FLAG ADOPTED UNDER
CHAPTER 48 OF THE ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF 1904.
(B) (1) THE STATE FLAG BEARS THE ARMS OF THE CALVERT AND
CROSSLAND FAMILIES AND IS DIVIDED INTO QUARTERS.
(2) THE TOP–LEFT AND BOTTOM–RIGHT QUARTERS DISPLAY THE
COAT OF ARMS FOR THE CALVERT FAMILY THAT IS A PALY OF SIX PIECES, OR (GOLD)
AND SABLE (BLACK), AND A BEND DEXTER (RIGHT DIAGONAL BAND)
COUNTERCHANGED, SO THAT THEY CONSIST OF SIX ALTERNATING GOLD AND BLACK
VERTICAL BARS WITH A DIAGONAL BAND ON WHICH THE COLORS ARE REVERSED.
(3) THE TOP–RIGHT AND BOTTOM–LEFT QUARTERS SHOW THE COAT
OF ARMS OF THE CROSSLAND FAMILY AND ARE QUARTERED ARGENT (WHITE) AND
GULES (RED), A CROSS BOTTONY COUNTERCHANGED, SO THAT THEY CONSIST OF A
QUARTERED FIELD OF WHITE AND RED, CHARGED WITH A CROSS BOTTONY THAT

SENATE BILL 1006 3
HAS ARMS TERMINATING IN A BUTTON OR THREE–LEAF CLOVER AND OPPOSITE
COLORING.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the General Assembly
determines that the amendment to the Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 4 of this
Act affects multiple jurisdictions and that the provisions of Article XIV, § 1 of the Maryland
Constitution concerning local approval of constitutional amendments do not apply.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The amendment to the Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 4 of this
Act shall be submitted to the qualified voters of the State at the next general election to be
held in November 2026 for adoption or rejection in accordance with Article XIV of the
Maryland Constitution.
(b) (1) At that general election, the vote on the proposed amendment to the
Constitution shall be by ballot, and on each ballot there shall be printed the words “For the
Constitutional Amendment” and “Against the Constitutional Amendment”, as now
provided by law.
(2) At that general election, a question substantially similar to the
following shall be submitted to the qualified voters of the State:
“Question ____ – Constitutional Amendment
Providing that the State flag shall continue to be the Maryland flag adopted under Chapter
48 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 1904.”.
(c) Immediately after the election, all returns shall be made to the Governor of
the vote for and against the proposed amendment, as directed by Article XIV of the
Maryland Constitution, and further proceedings held in accordance with Article XIV.
SECTION 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Sections 1, 2, and 3 of this
Act are contingent on the passage of Section 4 of this Act, a constitutional amendment, and
its ratification by the voters of the State.
SECTION 8. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 7 of this
Act, Sections 1, 2, and 3 of this Act shall take effect on the proclamation of the Governor
that the constitutional amendment, having received a majority of the votes cast at the
general election, has been adopted by the people of Maryland.